District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

11-2312

Tissue transplants.

Repealed.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 520, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Nov. 22, 2000, 114 Stat. 2440, Pub. L. 106-522, § 148(a)

History

1981 Ed., § 11-2312.
1973 Ed., § 11-2312.

Prior Codifications